test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-puetted_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - pueʹtted: # Verb 'come/tulla' - full paradigm
     pueʹtted+V+Inf: puẹʹtted
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puäđam
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: puäđak
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puätt
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: puẹʹttep
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: puẹʹttveʹted
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: puäʹtˈte
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: puäʹđet
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puäʹđ
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puõʹtˈtem
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: puõʹtˈtiǩ
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puõʹđi
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: puõʹđim
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: puõʹđid
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: puõʹtˈte
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: puõʹtˈteš
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: puättam
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg1: pueʹđžem 
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg2: pueʹđžiǩ
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg3: pueʹđež
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Pl1: pueʹđžep
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Pl2: pueʹđžid
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Pl3: pueʹđže
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg4: pueʹđžet
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+ConNeg: pueʹđže
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg1: puäđčem
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg2: puäđčiǩ
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg3: puäđči
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Pl1: puäđčim
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Pl2: puäđčid
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Pl3: puäđče
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg4: puäđčeš
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+ConNeg: puäđče
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg2: puäʹđ
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg3: puäđas
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl1: puẹʹttep
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl2: puẹʹtted
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl3: puätˈtaz
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNeg: puäʹđ
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNegII: puåtˈtu
     pueʹtted+V+Actio+Ess: puẹʹttmen
     pueʹtted+V+Actio: puẹʹttem
     pueʹtted+V+PrsPrc: pueʹtti
     pueʹtted+V+PrfPrc: puättam
#     pueʹtted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: puåtˈtum
     pueʹtted+V+VAbess: pueʹđkani
     pueʹtted+V+GerTemp: puäʹđeen
     pueʹtted+V+GerInstr: puäʹđeeʹl
     pueʹtted+V+PrfPrc: puätˈtam
